Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 12. Deceptive Acts or Practices Relating to Spyware.

Sec. 45.45.792.
Prohibited conduct relating to spyware.

It is unlawful for a person who is not the owner or authorized user of a computer to engage in deceptive acts or practices described in this subsection using spyware. Deceptive acts or practices under this subsection are

causing a pop-up advertisement to be shown on the computer screen of a user by means of a spyware program, knowing that the pop-up advertisement is

displayed in response to a user accessing a specific

mark; or

Internet website address; and

purchased or acquired by a person other than

the mark owner;

a licensee of the mark;

an authorized agent of the owner of the mark;

an authorized user of the mark; or

a person advertising the lawful sale, lease, or transfer of products bearing the mark through a secondary marketplace for the sale of goods or services; and

purchasing advertising that violates (1) of this subsection if the purchaser of the advertising

receives notice of the violation from the mark owner; and

fails to stop the violation.

It is not a violation of this section for a person to display a pop-up advertisement under (a)(1) of this section if the spyware program includes a function that

requests information about the user’s state of residence before displaying a pop-up advertisement to the user, and the user indicates a residence outside this state;

implements a reasonably reliable automated system to determine the user’s likely geographic location, according to current best practices in the field, and the system determines that it is unlikely that the user is located in this state; and

does not prompt, ask, or otherwise encourage a user to indicate a residence outside this state.

It is not a violation of (a)(2) of this section if a person purchases advertising that complies with the requirements of (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 97 SLA 2005)

Sec. 45.45.794.
Removal of potentially harmful software.

Notwithstanding AS

45.45.792

, a provider of computer software or an interactive computer service may, after notice to a customer, remove from or disable a program on the customer’s computer that is used to

violate AS

45.45.792

; or

collect information from the computer of the customer without the customer’s knowledge.

History.

(§ 3 ch 97 SLA 2005)

Sec. 45.45.798.
Definitions.

In AS

45.45.792

—

45.45.798

,

“interactive computer service” means an information service, system, or access software provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple users to a computer server; “interactive computer service” includes an Internet or online service provider or a service or system providing access to the Internet, including a system operated by a library or educational institution;

“Internet” means the combination of computer systems or networks that make up the international network for interactive communications services, including remote logins, file transfer, electronic mail, and newsgroups;

“Internet or online service provider” means an interactive computer service that provides software or other material that enables a person to transmit, receive, display, forward, cache, search, subset, organize, reorganize, or translate content; select or analyze content; or allow or disallow content;

“mark” means a registered trademark, registered service mark, or registered domain name in an Internet website address that is owned, licensed, or lawfully used by a person doing business in this state;

“pop-up advertisement” means material offering for sale or advertising the availability or quality of a property, good, or service that is displayed on a user’s computer screen, without any request or consent of the user, separate from an Internet website that a user intentionally accesses;

“spyware”

means software on the computer of a user who resides in the state that

collects information about an Internet website at the time the Internet website is being viewed in the state, unless the Internet website is the Internet website of the person who provides the software; and

uses the information collected contemporaneously to display a pop-up advertisement on the computer;

does not mean

an Internet website;

a service operated by an Internet or online service provider accessed by a user;

software designed and installed primarily to prevent, diagnose, detect, or resolve technical difficulties or prevent fraudulent activities;

software designed and installed to protect the security of the user’s computer from unauthorized access or alteration;

software or data that reports information to an Internet website previously stored by the Internet website on the user’s computer, including a cookie; in this sub-subparagraph, “cookie” means a text file that is placed on a computer to record information that can be read or recognized when the user of the computer later accesses a particular Internet website, online location, or online service by an interactive computer service, Internet website, or a third party acting on behalf of an interactive computer service or an Internet website;

software that provides the user with the capability to search the Internet;

software installed on the user’s computer with the consent of the user the primary purpose of which is to prevent access to certain Internet content;

“user” means the owner or authorized user of a computer.

History.

(§ 3 ch 97 SLA 2005)